Tennessee, session 114, HB2154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-126(c)(5), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(H) Total amount of guardian ad litem administrative fees that were not waived
but were not collected.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2154
012180
- 1 -